Maryland, session 2026, HB0827.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – General
9–205.
(a) (1) The Comptroller may enter into reciprocal agreements on behalf of this
State, with the duly authorized representatives of any other state, that provide for:
(i) fuel tax registration of vehicles by motor carriers;
(ii) establishment of periodic fuel use reporting and fuel use tax
payment requirements by motor carriers; and
(iii) disbursement of money that is collected by the Comptroller and
is due to other states based on:
1. mileage travelled and fuel used in those states; and
2. the respective registration fees of those states.
(2) The Comptroller may not enter into any reciprocal agreement that
would affect:
(i) this State’s motor carrier tax rate; or
(ii) this State’s registration fee for motor carriers.

HOUSE BILL 827 3
(b) In exercising the authority granted under subsection (a) of this section, the
Comptroller is expressly authorized to:
(1) enter into regional or national fuel use tax agreements;
(2) become a member of any regional or national conference, group,
compact, or similar organization of motor carrier fuel use tax administrators; and
(3) enforce the provisions set forth in any regional or national fuel use tax
agreements.
(c) The agreement provisions shall apply to the fuel use taxation, registration,
and reporting requirements of motor carriers subject to the provisions of the agreement
without reference to or application of any other statutes of this State.
9–305.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, the motor fuel tax rate is:
(1) 7 cents for each gallon of aviation gasoline;
(2) 23.5 cents for each gallon of gasoline other than aviation gasoline;
(3) 24.25 cents for each gallon of special fuel other than clean–burning fuel
or turbine fuel;
(4) 7 cents for each gallon of turbine fuel; and
(5) 23.5 cents for each gasoline–equivalent gallon of clean–burning fuel
except electricity.
(b) (1) In this subsection, “Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers”
means the index published monthly by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the U.S.
Department of Labor that is the U.S. city average of all items in a basket of consumer goods
and services.
(2) The motor fuel tax rates specified in subsection (a)(2), (3), and (5) of this
section shall be increased on July 1, 2013, [and] July 1 [of each subsequent year], 2014,
JULY 1, 2015, JULY 1, 2016, JULY 1, 2017, JULY 1, 2018, JULY 1, 2019, JULY 1, 2020,
JULY 1, 2021, JULY 1, 2022, JULY 1, 2023, JULY 1, 2024, AND JULY 1, 2025, in
accordance with this subsection.
(3) On or before June 1 [of each year], 2013, JUNE 1, 2014, JUNE 1,
2015, JUNE 1, 2016, JUNE 1, 2017, JUNE 1, 2018, JUNE 1, 2019, JUNE 1, 2020, JUNE
1, 2021, JUNE 1, 2022, JUNE 1, 2023, JUNE 1, 2024, AND JUNE 1, 2025, the
Comptroller shall determine and announce:

HOUSE BILL 827
(i) the growth in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban
Consumers as determined by the Comptroller under paragraph (4) of this subsection; and
(ii) the motor fuel tax rates effective for the fiscal year beginning on
the following July 1 as determined by the Comptroller under paragraph (5) of this
subsection.
(4) The percentage growth in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban
Consumers shall be determined by comparing the average of the index for the 12 months
ending on the preceding April 30 to the average of the index for the prior 12 months.
(5) Subject to paragraph (6) of this subsection, on July 1 [of each year],
2013, JULY 1, 2014, JULY 1, 2015, JULY 1, 2016, JULY 1, 2017, JULY 1, 2018, JULY
1, 2019, JULY 1, 2020, JULY 1, 2021, JULY 1, 2022, JULY 1, 2023, JULY 1, 2024, AND
JULY 1, 2025, each motor fuel tax rate specified in subsection (a)(2), (3), and (5) of this
section shall be increased by the amount, rounded to the nearest one–tenth of a cent, that
equals the product of multiplying:
(i) the motor fuel tax rate in effect on the date of the Comptroller’s
announcement under paragraph (3) of this subsection; and
(ii) the percentage growth in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban
Consumers.
(6) (i) If there is a decline or no growth in the Consumer Price Index for
All Urban Consumers, the motor fuel tax rates shall remain unchanged.
(ii) Any increase in the motor fuel tax rates under paragraph (5) of
this subsection may not be greater than 8% of the motor fuel tax rate effective in the
previous year.
(7) The Comptroller shall require any person possessing tax–paid motor
fuel for sale at the start of business on the date of an increase in the motor fuel tax under
this subsection to compile and file an inventory of the motor fuel held at the close of
business on the immediately preceding date and remit within 30 days any additional motor
fuel tax that is due on the motor fuel.
SUBTITLE 4. VEHICLE–MILES–TRAVELED TAX – PROHIBITED.
9–401.
(A) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, THE STATE OR A LOCAL
JURISDICTION MAY NOT DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY, INCLUDING THROUGH A
THIRD–PARTY AGREEMENT OR AS PART OF A PILOT PROGRAM OR STUDY, IMPOSE OR
LEVY:

HOUSE BILL 827 5
(1) A VEHICLE–MILES–TRAVELED TAX;
(2) A MILEAGE–BASED USER FEE;
(3) A TOLL BASED ON GLOBAL POSITIONING SATELLITE TRACKING;
OR
(4) ANY OTHER SIMILAR FORM OF TAX.
(B) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO PROHIBIT THE
COMPTROLLER FROM ENTERING INTO AND THE STATE FROM ENFORCING AN
AGREEMENT IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 9–205 OF THIS TITLE.
Article – Transportation
7–208.
(b–1) (1) Subject to § 7–506 of this title and paragraph [(2)] (3) of this subsection,
ON OR BEFORE JULY 1 EACH YEAR, the Administration shall set the fare prices and
collect other operating revenues IN AN AMOUNT SUFFICIENT TO ACHIEVE THE FAREBOX
RECOVERY REQUIREMENT ESTABLISHED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(2) (I) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, FOR
EACH FISCAL YEAR, THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL SEPARATELY RECOVER FROM
FARES AND OTHER OPERATING REVENUES AT LEAST 35% OF THE TOTAL OPERATING
COSTS FOR:
1. THE ADMINISTRATION’S BUS, LIGHT RAIL, AND
METRO SUBWAY SERVICES IN THE BALTIMORE REGION; AND
2. ALL PASSENGER RAILROAD SERVICES UNDER THE
ADMINISTRATION’S CONTROL.
(II) THE PERCENTAGE OF TOTAL OPERATING COSTS REQUIRED
TO BE RECOVERED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH IS EQUAL TO:
1. FOR FISCAL YEAR 2027, 15%;
2. FOR FISCAL YEAR 2028, 20%;
3. FOR FISCAL YEAR 2029, 25%;
4. FOR FISCAL YEAR 2030, 30%; AND

HOUSE BILL 827
5. FOR FISCAL YEAR 2031 AND EACH FISCAL YEAR
THEREAFTER, THE PERCENTAGE SPECIFIED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH.
[(2)] (3) The Administration may not reduce the level of services provided
by the Administration for the purpose of achieving a specific farebox recovery requirement.
(4) AN INCREASE IN THE ADMINISTRATION’S FARE PRICES BY THE
MINIMUM AMOUNT REQUIRED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION IS NOT SUBJECT TO THE
REQUIREMENTS OF § 7–506 OF THIS TITLE.
7–506.
(a) (1) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section OR § 7–208(B–1)(4)
OF THIS TITLE, until a public hearing is held on the matter, the Administration may not:
(i) Fix or revise any fare or rate charged the general public;
(ii) Establish or abandon any bus or rail route listed on a published
timetable;
(iii) Change a bus or rail route alignment listed on a published
timetable, unless the change is needed because of temporary construction or changes in the
road network;
(iv) Reduce the frequency, number of days, or days of service for a
commuter bus or commuter rail route without substituting a comparable level of service,
unless the reduction is temporary or a result of:
1. A natural disaster;
2. Weather or other emergency conditions;
3. Schedule adjustments required by a third party that
operates service on the same right–of–way; or
4. Other circumstances beyond the control of the
Administration; or
(v) Establish or abandon a rail transit station.
22–107.

HOUSE BILL 827 7
THE STATE OR A LOCAL JURISDICTION MAY NOT REQUIRE THE INSTALLATION
OF A DEVICE IN OR ON A PRIVATELY OWNED VEHICLE TO FACILITATE THE
REPORTING OF THE NUMBER OF VEHICLE MILES TRAVELED.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026.